Nebraska, session 109, LB819.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB819 LB819
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 81-1228, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1228 For purposes of the Rural Workforce Housing Investment Act:
(1) Department means the Department of Economic Development;
(2) Director means the Director of Economic Development;
(3) Eligible activities of a nonprofit development organization
means:
(a) New construction of owner-occupied or rental housing in a
community with demonstrated workforce housing needs;
(b) Substantial repair or rehabilitation of dilapidated housing
stock;
(c) Upper-story housing development; or
(d) Extension of sewer or water service in support of workforce
housing;
(4) HOME funds means funds awarded as formula grants under the HOME
Investment Partnerships Program administered by the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development;
(5) Matching funds means dollars contributed by individuals,
businesses, foundations, local, regional, and statewide political
subdivisions, or other nonprofit organizations to a workforce housing
investment fund administered by a nonprofit development organization;
(6) Nonprofit development organization means a local, regional, or
statewide nonprofit development organization approved by the director;
(7) Qualified activities include, but are not limited to, purchase
and rental guarantees, loan guarantees, loan participations, and other
credit enhancements or any other form of assistance designed to reduce
the cost of workforce housing related to eligible activities of the
nonprofit development organization;
(8) Qualified investment means a cash investment in a workforce
housing investment fund administered by a nonprofit development
organization;
-2-

LB819 LB819
2026 2026
(9) Rural community means any municipality in a county with a
population of fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined
by the most recent federal decennial census;
(10) Workforce housing means:
(a) Housing that meets the needs of today's working families;
(b) Housing that is attractive to new residents considering
relocation to a rural community;
(c) Owner-occupied housing units that cost not more than three
hundred seventy-five twenty-five thousand dollars to construct or rental
housing units that cost not more than three two hundred fifty thousand
dollars per unit to construct. For purposes of this subdivision (c),
housing unit costs shall be updated annually by the department based upon
the most recent increase or decrease in the Producer Price Index for all
commodities, published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau
of Labor Statistics;
(d) Owner-occupied and rental housing units for which the cost to
substantially rehabilitate exceeds fifty percent of a unit's assessed
value;
(e) Upper-story housing; and
(f) Housing units that do not receive federal or state low-income
housing tax credits, community development block grants, HOME funds, or
funds from the National Housing Trust Fund, which would impose individual
or household income limitations or restrictions on such housing units, or
funding from the Affordable Housing Trust Fund restricting the level of
individual or household income to anything less than one hundred percent
of area median income as calculated by the United States Department of
Housing and Urban Development; and
(11) Workforce housing investment fund means a fund that has been
created by a nonprofit development organization and certified by the
director to encourage development of workforce housing in rural
communities.
-3-

LB819 LB819
2026 2026
Sec. 2. Section 81-1229, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1229 (1) The director shall establish a workforce housing grant
program to foster and support the development of workforce housing in
rural communities.
(2) A nonprofit development organization may apply to the director
for approval of a workforce housing grant for a workforce housing
investment fund. The application shall be in a form and manner prescribed
by the director. Through fiscal year 2036-37 2026-27, grants shall be
awarded by the director on a competitive basis until grant funds are no
longer available. A nonprofit development organization may apply for more
than one grant, subject to the following limits:
(a) The maximum amount of grant funds awarded to any one nonprofit
development organization over a two-year period shall not exceed five
million dollars; and
(b) The maximum amount of grant funds awarded to any one nonprofit
development organization for all program years shall not exceed an
aggregate limit determined by the department at the discretion of the
director.
(3) An applicant shall provide matching funds of at least one-
quarter of the amount of workforce housing grant funds awarded.
Unallocated workforce housing grant funds held by the department shall be
rolled to the next program year.
(4) Grants shall be awarded based upon:
(a) A demonstrated and ongoing housing need as identified by a
recent housing study;
(b) A community or region that has a low unemployment rate and is
having difficulty attracting workers and filling employment positions;
(c) A community or region that exhibits a demonstrated commitment to
growing its housing stock;
(d) Projects that can reasonably be ready for occupancy in a period
-4-

LB819 LB819
2026 2026
of twenty-four months; and
(e) A demonstrated ability to grow and manage a workforce housing
investment fund.
(5) A nonprofit development organization shall:
(a) Invest or intend to invest in workforce housing eligible
activities;
(b) Use any fees, interest, loan repayments, or other funds it
received as a result of the administration of the grant to support
qualified activities; and
(c) Have an active board of directors with expertise in development,
construction, and finance that meets at least quarterly to approve all
qualified investments made by the nonprofit development organization. A
nonprofit development organization shall have a formal plan and proven
expertise to invest unused workforce housing investment fund balances and
shall have an annual review of all financial records conducted by an
independent certified public accountant.
Sec. 3. Section 81-1230, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1230 (1) The Rural Workforce Housing Investment Fund is created.
Funding for the grant program described in section 81-1229 shall come
from the Rural Workforce Housing Investment Fund. The Rural Workforce
Housing Investment Fund may include revenue from appropriations from the
Legislature, grants, private contributions, and other sources. In
addition, the State Treasurer shall make a one-time transfer of seven
million three hundred thousand dollars on or before October 1, 2017, from
the Affordable Housing Trust Fund to the Rural Workforce Housing
Investment Fund. Any money in the Rural Workforce Housing Investment Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The department shall administer the Rural Workforce Housing
-5-

LB819 LB819
2026 2026
Investment Fund and may seek additional private or nonstate funds to use
in the grant program, including, but not limited to, contributions from
the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority and other interested parties.
(3) Interest earned by the department on grant funds shall be
applied to the grant program.
(4) If a nonprofit development organization fails to engage in the
initial qualified activity within twenty-four months after receiving
initial grant funding, the nonprofit development organization shall
return the grant funds to the department for credit to the General Fund.
(5) If a nonprofit development organization fails to allocate any
remaining initial grant funding on a qualified activity within twenty-
four months after engaging in the initial qualified activity, the
nonprofit development organization shall return such unallocated grant
funds to the department for credit to the Rural Workforce Housing
Investment Fund.
(6) Beginning July 1, 2037 2027, any funds held by the department in
the Rural Workforce Housing Investment Fund shall be transferred to the
General Fund.
Sec. 4. Section 81-1231, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1231 (1) Each nonprofit development organization shall submit an
annual report to the director to be included as a part of the
department's annual status report required under section 81-1201.11. The
report shall certify that the nonprofit development organization meets
the requirements of the Rural Workforce Housing Investment Act and shall
include a breakdown of program activities.
(2) The annual report shall include, but not necessarily be limited
to:
(a) The name and geographical location of the reporting nonprofit
development organization;
(b) The number, amount, and type of workforce housing investment
-6-

LB819 LB819
2026 2026
funds invested in qualified activities;
(c) The number, geographical location, type, and amount of
investments made;
(d) A summary of matching funds and where such matching funds were
generated; and
(e) The results of the annual review of all financial records
required under subsection (5) of section 81-1229.
(3) If a nonprofit development organization ceases administration of
a workforce housing investment fund, it shall file a final report with
the director in a form and manner required by the director. Before July
1, 2037 2027, any unallocated grant funds shall be returned to the
department for credit to the Rural Workforce Housing Investment Fund. On
and after July 1, 2037 2027, any unallocated grant funds shall be
returned to the department for transfer to the General Fund.
(4) If a nonprofit development organization fails to file a complete
annual report by February 15, the director may, in his or her discretion,
impose a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars for such
violation. All money collected by the department pursuant to this
subsection shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in
accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 5. Section 81-1238, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-1238 (1) The director shall establish a workforce housing
investment grant program to foster and support the development of
workforce housing in urban communities.
(2) A nonprofit development organization may apply to the director
for approval of a workforce housing grant for a workforce housing
investment fund. The application shall be in a form and manner prescribed
by the director. Through fiscal year 2036-37 2026-27, grants shall be
awarded by the director on a competitive basis until grant funds are no
longer available. Grant maximums shall not exceed ten million dollars to
-7-

LB819 LB819
2026 2026
any one nonprofit development organization over a two-year period, with
the cumulative amount for any single grantee to be determined by the
department at the discretion of the director. An applicant shall provide
matching funds for workforce housing grant funds awarded. For grant funds
awarded prior to July 19, 2024, an applicant shall provide matching funds
of at least fifty percent of the amount of such grant funds awarded. For
grant funds awarded on or after July 19, 2024, an applicant shall provide
matching funds of at least twenty-five percent of the amount of such
grant funds awarded. Unallocated funds held by the department shall be
rolled to the next program year.
(3) Grants shall be awarded based upon:
(a) A demonstrated need for additional housing. Need can be
demonstrated with a recent housing study or a letter from the planning
department of the city in which the fund is intending to operate stating
that the proposal is in line with the city's most recent consolidated
plan submitted under 24 C.F.R. part 91, subpart D, as such subpart
existed on January 1, 2020;
(b) A neighborhood or community that has a higher-than-state-average
unemployment rate;
(c) A neighborhood or community that exhibits a demonstrated
commitment to growing its housing stock;
(d) Reducing barriers to the development and purchase of owner-
occupied housing with flexible forms of assistance, including grants,
forgivable loans, homeownership incentive reserve accounts, purchase
option agreements, and other forms of long-term, patient financing;
(e) Projects that can reasonably be ready for occupancy in a period
of twenty-four months; and
(f) A demonstrated ability to grow and manage a workforce housing
investment fund.
(4) A workforce housing investment fund shall:
(a) Be required to receive annual certification from the department;
-8-

LB819 LB819
2026 2026
(b) Invest or intend to invest in eligible activities for a
workforce housing investment fund;
(c) Use any fees, interest, loan repayments, or other funds received
by the nonprofit development organization as a result of the
administration of the grant to support qualified activities; and
(d) Have an active board of directors with expertise in development,
construction, and finance that meets at least quarterly to approve all
qualified investments made by the nonprofit development organization. A
nonprofit development organization shall have a formal plan and proven
expertise to invest unused workforce housing investment fund balances and
shall conduct an annual audit of all financial records by an independent
certified public accountant.
(5) A nonprofit development organization that has previously
received a grant or grants under the Middle Income Workforce Housing
Investment Act shall not be eligible for an additional grant under this
section unless the organization has expended at least fifty percent of
the funds from such previous grant or grants.
Sec. 6. Section 81-1239, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-1239 (1) The Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund is
created. Funding for the grant program described in section 81-1238 shall
come from the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund. The Middle
Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund may include revenue transferred
at the direction of the Legislature, grants, private contributions, and
other sources. Any money in the Middle Income Workforce Housing
Investment Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The department shall establish a subaccount within the Middle
Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund that shall be used to fund
affordable housing and related land parcel preparation activities under
-9-

LB819 LB819
2026 2026
the Economic Recovery Act as described in subdivisions (4)(d) and (e) of
section 81-12,241.
(3) The department shall administer the Middle Income Workforce
Housing Investment Fund and may seek additional private or nonstate funds
to use in the grant program under the Middle Income Workforce Housing
Investment Act, including, but not limited to, contributions from the
Nebraska Investment Finance Authority and other interested parties.
(4) Interest earned by the department on grant funds shall be
applied to the grant program.
(5) If a nonprofit development organization, or a recipient of
subaccount funds described in subsection (2) of this section, fails to
engage in a qualified activity within twenty-four months after receiving
initial grant funding, the nonprofit development organization or
recipient of subaccount funds shall return the grant proceeds to the
department for credit to the General Fund.
(6) Beginning July 1, 2037 2029, any funds held by the department in
the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund shall be transferred
to the General Fund.
Sec. 7. Section 81-1240, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-1240 (1) Each nonprofit development organization shall submit an
annual report to the director to be included as a part of the
department's annual status report required under section 81-1201.11. The
report shall certify that the workforce housing investment fund meets the
requirements of the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Act and
shall include a breakdown of program activities.
(2) The annual report shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) The name and geographical location of the nonprofit development
organization;
(b) The number, amount, and type of workforce housing investment
funds invested in qualified activities;
-10-

LB819 LB819
2026 2026
(c) The number, geographical location, type, and amount of
investments made;
(d) A summary of matching funds and where such matching funds were
generated;
(e) The results of the annual audit required under subdivision (4)
(d) of section 81-1238; and
(f) The number of tenants assisted into homeownership, if
applicable.
(3) If a nonprofit development organization ceases administration of
a workforce housing investment fund, it shall file a final report with
the director in a form and manner required by the director. Before July
1, 2037 2029, any unallocated workforce housing investment fund grant
funds shall be returned for credit to the Middle Income Workforce Housing
Investment Fund. On and after July 1, 2037 2029, any unallocated
workforce housing investment fund grant funds shall be returned to the
department for transfer to the General Fund.
(4) If a workforce housing investment fund fails to file a complete
annual report by February 15, the director may, in his or her discretion,
impose a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars for such
violation. All money collected by the department pursuant to this
subsection shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in
accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
(5) This section does not apply to the subaccount of the Middle
Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund described in subsection (2) of
section 81-1239.
Sec. 8. Original sections 81-1228, 81-1229, 81-1230, and 81-1231,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 81-1238, 81-1239, and
81-1240, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-11-